pt-BR: Tamanho de placa de licença compatível: Padrão da Austrália (372 x 134 mm); Padrão do Brasil (400 x 130 mm); Tamanhos personalizados/especiais; Padrão da UE (520 x 110 mm); Padrão do Japão (330 x 165 mm); Padrão do Reino Unido (520 x 111 mm); Motocicleta dos EUA (7 x 4 pol); Padrão dos EUA/Canadá (12 x 6 pol); Universal/multiencaixe; Outro
ro-RO: Dimensiune compatibilă pentru placa de identificare: Standard Australia (372 x 134 mm); Standard Brazilia (400 x 130 mm); Dimensiuni personalizate; Standard UE (520 x 110 mm); Standard Japonia (330 x 165 mm); Standard UK (520 x 111 mm); Motocicletă SUA (7 x 4 in); Standard SUA/Canada (12 x 6 in); Universal / potrivire multiplă; Altele
nl: Compatibele kentekenplaat maat: Australische standaard (372 x 134 mm); Braziliaanse standaard (400 x 130 mm); Aangepaste/vanity-maten; EU-standaard (520 x 110 mm); Japanse standaard (330 x 165 mm); Britse standaard (520 x 111 mm); Amerikaanse motorfiets (7 x 4 in); VS/Canada-standaard (12 x 6 in); Universeel/multi-fit; Overig
lt-LT: Suderinamas numerio lentelės dydis: Australijos standartas (372 x 134 mm); Brazilijos standartas (400 x 130 mm); Pasirinktiniai / vardinių numerių dydžiai; ES standartas (520 x 110 mm); Japonijos standartas (330 x 165 mm); JK standartas (520 x 111 mm); JAV motociklų (7 x 4 col.); JAV / Kanados standartas (12 x 6 col.); Universalus / tinka įvairiems; Kita
sk-SK: Kompatibilná veľkosť tabuľky s evidenčným číslom vozidla: Štandard pre Austráliu (372 x 134 mm); Štandard pre Brazíliu (400 x 130 mm); Vlastné/špeciálne veľkosti; Štandard pre EÚ (520 x 110 mm); Štandard pre Japonsko (330 x 165 mm); Štandard pre Spojené kráľovstvo (520 x 111 mm); Motocykel USA (7 x 4 palce); Štandard pre USA/Kanadu (12 x 6 palcov); Univerzálna/viacúčelová veľkosť; Iné
sl-SI: Združljiva velikost registrske tablice: Avstralski standard (372 x 134 mm); Brazilski standard (400 x 130 mm); Velikosti po meri/posebne velikosti; Standard EU (520 x 110 mm); Japonski standard (330 x 165 mm); Standard Združenega kraljestva (520 x 111 mm); Za motorna kolesa v ZDA (7 x 4 in); Standard za ZDA/Kanado (12 x 6 in); Univerzalno/prilagodljivo; Drugo
ko: 호환 번호판 크기: 호주 표준(372 x 134mm); 브라질 표준(400 x 130mm); 맞춤형/치장용 사이즈; 유럽 표준(520 x 110mm); 일본 표준(330 x 165mm); 영국 표준(520 x 111mm); 미국 오토바이(7 x 4인치); 미국/캐나다 표준(12 x 6인치); 범용/멀티핏; 기타
zh-TW: 相容車牌尺寸: 澳洲標準 (372 x 134 公釐); 巴西標準 (400 x 130 公釐); 自訂/個性化尺寸; 歐盟標準 (520 x 110 公釐); 日本標準 (330 x 165 公釐); 英國標準 (520 x 111 公釐); 美國機車 (7 x 4 吋); 美/加標準 (12 x 6 吋); 通用/多種適用; 其他
es: Talla de la placa de identificación compatible: Estándar de Australia (372 x 134 mm); Estándar de Brasil (400 x 130 mm); Tamaños personalizados/decorativos; Estándar de la UE (520 x 110 mm); Estándar de Japón (330 x 165 mm); Estándar del Reino Unido (520 x 111 mm); Motocicleta de EE. UU. (7 x 4 in); Estándar de EE. UU./Canadá (12 x 6 in); Universal/multiajuste; Otro
pt-PT: Tamanho de matrícula compatível: Padrão da Austrália (372 x 134 mm); Padrão do Brasil (400 x 130 mm); Tamanhos personalizados/especiais; Padrão da UE (520 x 110 mm); Padrão do Japão (330 x 165 mm); Padrão do Reino Unido (520 x 111 mm); Motociclo dos EUA (7 x 4 pol.); Padrão dos EUA/Canadá (12 x 6 pol.); Universal/multiajuste; Outro
pl: Kompatybilny rozmiar tablicy rejestracyjnej: Standard australijski (372 x 134 mm); Standard brazylijski (400 x 130 mm); Niestandardowe / tablice indywidualne; Standard europejski (520 x 110 mm); Standard japoński (330 x 165 mm); Standard brytyjski (520 x 111 mm); Motocyklowe USA (7 x 4 cale); Standard USA/Kanada (12 x 6 cali); Uniwersalne / wielorozmiarowe; Inne
zh-CN: 适配车牌尺寸: 澳大利亚标准 (372 x 134 mm); 巴西标准 (400 x 130 mm); 自定义/个性化尺寸; 欧盟标准 (520 x 110 mm); 日本标准 (330 x 165 mm); 英国标准 (520 x 111 mm); 美国摩托车 (7 x 4 in); 美国/加拿大标准 (12 x 6 in); 通用/多适配; 其他
ru: Совместимый размер номерного знака: Стандарт Австралии (372 x 134 мм); Стандарт Бразилии (400 x 130 мм); Нестандартные / индивидуальные размеры; Стандарт ЕС (520 x 110 мм); Стандарт Японии (330 x 165 мм); Стандарт Великобритании (520 x 111 мм); Для мотоциклов США (7 x 4 дюйма); Стандарт США и Канады (12 x 6 дюймов); Универсальный / регулируемый; Другое
fr: Taille de plaque d’immatriculation compatible: Standard australien (372 x 134 mm); Standard brésilien (400 x 130 mm); Tailles personnalisées/plaques minéralogiques; Standard européen (520 x 110 mm); Standard japonais (330 x 165 mm); Standard britannique (520 x 111 mm); Moto américaine (7 x 4 po); Standard américain/canadien (12 x 6 po); Universel/multi-taille; Autre
nb: Kompatibel nummerskiltstørrelse: Australia-standard (372 x 134 mm); Brasil-standard (400 x 130 mm); Tilpassede/personlige størrelser; EU-standard (520 x 110 mm); Japan-standard (330 x 165 mm); Storbritannia-standard (520 x 111 mm); Amerikansk motorsykkel (7 x 4 tommer); USA/Canada-standard (12 x 6 tommer); Universell/multitilpasning; Annet
de: Kompatible Kennzeichengröße: Australien-Standard (372 x 134 mm); Brasilien-Standard (400 x 130 mm); Sondergrößen/Wunschkennzeichen; EU-Standard (520 x 110 mm); Japan-Standard (330 x 165 mm); UK-Standard (520 x 111 mm); US-Motorrad (7 x 4 Zoll); USA/Kanada-Standard (12 x 6 Zoll); Universal/Multi-Fit; Sonstige
sv: Kompatibel registreringsskyltsstorlek: Australisk standard (372 x 134 mm); Brasiliansk standard (400 x 130 mm); Special-/personliga storlekar; EU-standard (520 x 110 mm); Japansk standard (330 x 165 mm); Brittisk standard (520 x 111 mm); Motorcykel USA (7 x 4 tum); USA-/Kanada-standard (12 x 6 tum); Universell/multistandard; Övrigt
it: Targa identificativa compatibile taglia: Standard Australia (372 x 134 mm); Standard Brasile (400 x 130 mm); Dimensioni personalizzate/targhe personalizzate; Standard UE (520 x 110 mm); Standard Giappone (330 x 165 mm); Standard Regno Unito (520 x 111 mm); Motociclo USA (7 x 4 in); Standard USA/Canada (12 x 6 in); Universale/multi-fit; Altro
da: Kompatibel nummerpladestørrelse: Australsk standard (372 x 134 mm); Brasiliansk standard (400 x 130 mm); Specialstørrelser/personlige mål; EU-standard (520 x 110 mm); Japansk standard (330 x 165 mm); Britisk standard (520 x 111 mm); Amerikansk motorcykel (7 x 4 in); Amerikansk/canadisk standard (12 x 6 in); Universel/multipasform; Andet
hr-HR: Kompatibilna veličina registarske ploče: Australski standard (372 x 134 mm); Brazilski standard (400 x 130 mm); Prilagođene / personalizirane veličine; EU standard (520 x 110 mm); Japanski standard (330 x 165 mm); UK standard (520 x 111 mm); SAD motocikl (7 x 4 in); SAD/Kanada standard (12 x 6 in); Univerzalno / prilagodljivo više modela; Ostalo
bg-BG: Съвместим размер на регистрационен номер: Стандарт в Австралия (372 x 134 мм); Стандарт в Бразилия (400 x 130 мм); Персонализирани/специални размери; Стандарт в ЕС (520 x 110 мм); Стандарт в Япония (330 x 165 мм); Стандарт в Обединеното кралство (520 x 111 мм); За мотоциклети в САЩ (7 x 4 инча); Стандарт в САЩ/Канада (12 x 6 инча); Универсален/подходящ за различни размери; Друго
hu: Kompatibilis rendszámtábla-méret: Ausztrál szabvány (372 x 134 mm); Brazil szabvány (400 x 130 mm); Egyedi/rendszámtábla méretek; EU szabvány (520 x 110 mm); Japán szabvány (330 x 165 mm); Egyesült királyságbeli szabvány (520 x 111 mm); USA motorkerékpár (7 x 4 hüvelyk); USA/Kanada szabvány (12 x 6 hüvelyk); Univerzális/többféle méretű; Egyéb
th: ขนาดป้ายทะเบียนที่เข้ากันได้: มาตรฐานออสเตรเลีย (372 x 134 มม.); มาตรฐานบราซิล (400 x 130 มม.); ขนาดกำหนดเอง/ป้ายประมูล; มาตรฐาน EU (520 x 110 มม.); มาตรฐานญี่ปุ่น (330 x 165 มม.); มาตรฐานสหราชอาณาจักร (520 x 111 มม.); มอเตอร์ไซค์สหรัฐอเมริกา (7 x 4 นิ้ว); มาตรฐานสหรัฐอเมริกา/แคนาดา (12 x 6 นิ้ว); อเนกประสงค์/ใช้ได้กับหลายขนาด; อื่นๆ
vi: Kích thước biển số tương thích: Tiêu chuẩn Úc (372 x 134 mm); Tiêu chuẩn Brazil (400 x 130 mm); Kích cỡ tùy chỉnh/biển số đẹp; Tiêu chuẩn EU (520 x 110 mm); Tiêu chuẩn Nhật Bản (330 x 165 mm); Tiêu chuẩn Anh (520 x 111 mm); Xe máy Mỹ (7 x 4 in); Tiêu chuẩn Mỹ/Canada (12 x 6 in); Phổ thông/đa kích cỡ; Khác
cs: Kompatibilní velikost registrační značky: Australský standard (372 x 134 mm); Brazilský standard (400 x 130 mm); Vlastní / speciální velikosti; Standard EU (520 x 110 mm); Japonský standard (330 x 165 mm); Standard UK (520 x 111 mm); Motocykl USA (7 x 4 palce); Standard USA/Kanada (12 x 6 palců); Univerzální / Multi-fit; Jiné
tr: Uyumlu plaka boyutu: Avustralya standardı (372 x 134 mm); Brezilya standardı (400 x 130 mm); Özel/kişiselleştirilmiş boyutlar; AB standardı (520 x 110 mm); Japonya standardı (330 x 165 mm); Birleşik Krallık standardı (520 x 111 mm); ABD motosiklet (7 x 4 inç); ABD/Kanada standardı (12 x 6 inç); Evrensel/çoklu uyum; Diğer
en: Compatible license plate size: Australia standard (372 x 134 mm); Brazil standard (400 x 130 mm); Custom/vanity sizes; EU standard (520 x 110 mm); Japan standard (330 x 165 mm); UK standard (520 x 111 mm); US motorcycle (7 x 4 in); US/Canada standard (12 x 6 in); Universal/multi-fit; Other
ja: 互換性のあるライセンスプレートのサイズ: オーストラリア標準 (372 x 134 mm); ブラジル標準 (400 x 130 mm); カスタム/バニティサイズ; EU標準 (520 x 110 mm); 日本標準 (330 x 165 mm); イギリス標準 (520 x 111 mm); USモーターサイクル (7 x 4 インチ); US/カナダ標準 (12 x 6 インチ); ユニバーサル/マルチフィット; その他
fi: Yhteensopiva rekisterikilven koko: Australian vakio (372 x 134 mm); Brasilian vakio (400 x 130 mm); Mukautetut / erikoiskoot; EU-vakio (520 x 110 mm); Japanin vakio (330 x 165 mm); UK-vakio (520 x 111 mm); US-moottoripyörä (7 x 4 in); US/Kanada-vakio (12 x 6 in); Yleinen / monikäyttöinen; Muu
el: Συμβατό μέγεθος πινακίδας κυκλοφορίας: Κανονική Αυστραλίας (372 x 134 mm); Κανονική Βραζιλίας (400 x 130 mm); Προσαρμοσμένα μεγέθη/vanity; Κανονική ΕΕ (520 x 110 mm); Κανονική Ιαπωνίας (330 x 165 mm); Κανονική ΗΒ (520 x 111 mm); Μοτοσικλέτας ΗΠΑ (7 x 4 in); Κανονική ΗΠΑ/Καναδά (12 x 6 in); Γενικής χρήσης/πολλαπλής εφαρμογής; Άλλο